Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201852-504
Lien satisfied; financing statement; termination.

When
a lien created under section 52-501 is satisfied, any financing statement filed to perfect
that lien shall be terminated in the manner and form provided in article 9,
Uniform Commercial Code.

Laws 1985, LB 606, § 11;

Laws 1988, LB 943, § 4;

Laws 1999, LB 550, § 15;

Laws 2001, LB 54, § 6;

Laws 2014, LB750, § 5.